dictionaries/hu/index.aff
PFX X Y 65 
PFX X 0 újra/1261 . 22741
PFX X 0 újjá/1261 . 22742
PFX X 0 össze/1261 . 22743
PFX X 0 át/1261 . 22744
PFX X 0 által/1261 . 22745
PFX X 0 végig/1261 . 22746
PFX X 0 végbe/1261 . 22747
PFX X 0 vissza/1261 . 22748
PFX X 0 utána/1261 . 22749
PFX X 0 túl/1261 . 22750
PFX X 0 tovább- b 22751
PFX X 0 tovább/1261 [^b] 22752
PFX X 0 tova/1261 . 22753
PFX X 0 tele/1261 . 22754
PFX X 0 szét/1261 . 22755
PFX X 0 széjjel/1261 . 22756
PFX X 0 szerte/1261 . 22757
PFX X 0 szembe/1261 . 22758
PFX X 0 rá/1261 . 22759
PFX X 0 rajta/1261 . 22760
PFX X 0 oda/1261 . 22761
PFX X 0 neki/1261 . 22762
PFX X 0 mellé/1261 . 22763
PFX X 0 meg/1261 . 22764
PFX X 0 le/1261 . 22765
PFX X 0 külön/1261 . 22766
PFX X 0 közre/1261 . 22767
PFX X 0 közbe/1261 . 22768
PFX X 0 körül/1261 . 22769
PFX X 0 körbe/1261 . 22770
PFX X 0 kölcsön/1261 . 22771
PFX X 0 ki/1261 . 22772
PFX X 0 ketté/1261 . 22773
PFX X 0 keresztül/1261 . 22774
PFX X 0 jóvá/1261 . 22775
PFX X 0 ide/1261 . 22776
PFX X 0 hátra/1261 . 22777
PFX X 0 hozzá/1261 . 22778
PFX X 0 helyre/1261 . 22779
PFX X 0 haza/1261 . 22780
PFX X 0 fönn- n[^y] 22781
PFX X 0 fönn/1261 ny 22782
PFX X 0 fönn/1261 [^n] 22782
PFX X 0 fölül/1261 . 22783
PFX X 0 föl/1261 . 22784
PFX X 0 félre/1261 . 22785
PFX X 0 félbe/1261 . 22786
PFX X 0 fenn- n[^y] 22787
PFX X 0 fenn/1261 ny 22788
PFX X 0 fenn/1261 [^n] 22788
PFX X 0 felül/1261 . 22789
PFX X 0 fel/1261 . 22790
PFX X 0 előre/1261 . 22791
PFX X 0 elő/1261 . 22792
PFX X 0 ellen/1261 . 22793
PFX X 0 el/1261 . 22794
PFX X 0 egybe/1261 . 22795
PFX X 0 benn- n[^y] 22796
PFX X 0 benn/1261 ny 22797
PFX X 0 benn/1261 [^n] 22797
PFX X 0 bele/1261 . 22798
PFX X 0 be/1261 . 22799
PFX X 0 alá/1261 . 22800
PFX X 0 agyon/1261 . 22801
PFX X 0 abba/1261 . 22802
     
PFX D Y 3 
PFX D 0 legeslegesleg [^AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWZ] 22803
PFX D 0 legesleg [^AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWZ] 22804
PFX D 0 leg [^AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWZ] 22805
PFX " Y 39 
PFX " Ü ü Ü
PFX " Ű ű Ű
PFX " Ú ú Ú
PFX " Ö ö Ö
PFX " Ő ő Ő
PFX " Ó ó Ó
PFX " Í í Í
PFX " É é É
PFX " Č č Č
PFX " Á á Á
PFX " Š š Š
PFX " Ł ł Ł
PFX " Z z Z
PFX " Y y Y
PFX " X x X
PFX " W w W
PFX " V v V
PFX " U u U
PFX " T t T
PFX " S s S
PFX " R r R
PFX " Q q Q
PFX " P p P
PFX " O o O
PFX " N n N
PFX " M m M
PFX " L l L
PFX " K k K
PFX " J j J
PFX " I i I
PFX " H h H
PFX " G g G
PFX " F f F
PFX " E e E
PFX " D d D
PFX " C c C
PFX " B b B
PFX " A a A
PFX " Å å Å
PFX ! Y 27 
PFX ! 0 ötven/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 öt/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 több/1262 [^b] 22740
PFX ! 0 tíz/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 trillió/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 száz/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 sok/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 négy/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 nyolcvan/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 nyolc/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 negyven/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 millió/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 milliárd/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 két/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 kilencven/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 kilenc/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 húsz/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 hét/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 három/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 hetven/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 hatvan/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 hat/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 harminc/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 fél/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 ezer/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 egy/1262 . 22740
PFX ! 0 billió/1262 . 22740
     
